Washington statutes.
RCW 6.23.060

Sheriff's deed—When issued.

If no redemption is made within the redemption period prescribed by RCW 6.23.020 or within any extension of that period under any other provision of this chapter, the purchaser is entitled to a sheriff's deed; or, if so redeemed, whenever sixty days have elapsed and no other redemption has been made or notice given operating to extend the period for re-redemption, and the time for redemption by the judgment debtor has expired, the last redemptioner is entitled to receive a sheriff's deed as provided in RCW 6.21.120.

[ 1987 c 442 s 706; 1961 c 196 s 2; 1899 c 53 s 10; RRS s 597. Prior: 1897 c 50 s 16. Formerly RCW 6.24.160.]